src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON SIJDDALAHÁ  !!= @CODE@ Plurals
                                +Cmp/SgNom:ij%>              R              ;
                                +Cmp/PlGen:aháj%>Q1          R              ;
                                   +Pl+Nom:ahá%>             K-VOW          ;
                                   +Pl+Gen:ahá%>j            K-CONS         ;
                                   +Pl+Acc:ahá%>jt           K-CONS         ;
                                   +Pl+Ill:ahá%>jda          K-VOW          ;
                                   +Pl+Ine:ahá%>jn           K-CONS         ;
                                   +Pl+Ela:ahá%>js           K-CONS         ;
                                   +Pl+Com:ahá%>j            K-CONS         ;
                                   +Pl+Acc:ahá%>jd%>         PxC            ; !
                                   +Pl+Ine:ahá%>jn%>         PxC            ; !
                                   +Pl+Ela:ahá%>jst%>        PxC            ; !
                                      +Ess:ahá%>n            K-CONS         ;
                             +Err/Infl+Abe:ahá%>Q1dak        K-CONS         ;
                             +Err/Infl+Abe:ahá%>Q1da         K-VOW          ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:ahá»tja           K-VOW          ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:ahá»tjij          K-CONS         ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:ahá»tjijt         K-CONS         ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:ahá»tjijda        K-VOW          ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:ahá»tjijn         K-CONS         ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:ahá»tjijs         K-CONS         ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:ahá»tjij          K-CONS         ;
!                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:ahá»tjijd%>       PxCs           ; !
!                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:ahá»tjijn%>       PxCs           ; !
!                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:ahá»tjijst%>      PxCs           ; !
                     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:ahá»tjin          K-CONS         ;
                         +Der2+Der/Dimin+N:ahá»tji           DAGI_PLURAL    ;
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:ahá»X7tja»ttja    K-VOW          ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:ahá»X7tja»ttjaj   K-CONS         ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:ahá»X7tja»ttjajt  K-CONS         ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:ahá»X7tja»ttjajda K-VOW          ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:ahá»X7tja»ttjajn  K-CONS         ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:ahá»X7tja»ttjajs  K-CONS         ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:ahá»X7tja»ttjaj   K-CONS         ; !Dobbel diminutiv
     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:ahá»X7tja»ttjin   K-CONS         ; !Dobbel diminutiv
                                          :ahá%>             DAGI_PLURAL    ;

! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Attr:#»ahtes%> ATTR ; Only for odd-syllble stems
!                      +Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:#»ahtá%>          K              ;
!                      +Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:#»ahti%>          K              ;
!                 +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:#»ahtes%>         K              ;
!                 +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:#»ahttá%>         PxV            ; !
!                    +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Ess:#»ahttá%>n        K              ;
!         +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Der5+Der/vuota:#»ahtes           VUOHTA         ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
!                        +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%>         ILL-EVENCASE   ;
!                        +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%>         N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
!                        +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%>         BU/MUS         ;

!!€gt-norm: lullelahá # Even-syllable test
!!€ lullelahá:                 lullelahá+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ lullelahájt:                 lullelahá+N+Pl+Acc

 LEXICON SISSNELUHÁ  !!= @CODE@ plurals. presently only for sissŋeluhá
                                +Cmp/SgNom:uj%>              R           ;
                                +Cmp/PlGen:uháj%>Q1          R           ;
                                   +Pl+Nom:uhá%>             K-VOW       ;
                                   +Pl+Gen:uhá%>j            K-CONS      ;
                                   +Pl+Acc:uhá%>jt           K-CONS      ;
                                   +Pl+Ill:uhá%>jda          K-VOW       ;
                                   +Pl+Ine:uhá%>jn           K-CONS      ;
                                   +Pl+Ela:uhá%>js           K-CONS      ;
                                   +Pl+Com:uhá%>j            K-CONS      ;
                                   +Pl+Acc:uhá%>jd%>         PxC         ; !
                                   +Pl+Ine:uhá%>jn%>         PxC         ; !
                                   +Pl+Ela:uhá%>jst%>        PxC         ; !
                                      +Ess:uhá%>n            K-CONS      ;
                             +Err/Infl+Abe:uhá%>Q1dak        K-CONS      ;
                             +Err/Infl+Abe:uhá%>Q1da         K-VOW       ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:uhá»tja           K-VOW       ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:uhá»tjij          K-CONS      ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:uhá»tjijt         K-CONS      ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:uhá»tjijda        K-VOW       ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:uhá»tjijn         K-CONS      ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:uhá»tjijs         K-CONS      ;
                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:uhá»tjij          K-CONS      ;
!                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:uhá»tjijd%>       PxCs        ; !
!                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:uhá»tjijn%>       PxCs        ; !
!                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:uhá»tjijst%>      PxCs        ; !
                     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:uhá»tjin          K-CONS      ;
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:uhá»X7tja»ttja    K-VOW       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:uhá»X7tja»ttjaj   K-CONS      ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:uhá»X7tja»ttjajt  K-CONS      ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:uhá»X7tja»ttjajda K-VOW       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:uhá»X7tja»ttjajn  K-CONS      ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:uhá»X7tja»ttjajs  K-CONS      ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:uhá»X7tja»ttjaj   K-CONS      ; !Dobbel diminutiv
     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:uhá»X7tja»ttjin   K-CONS      ; !Dobbel diminutiv
                                          :uhá%>             DAGI_PLURAL ;

                         +Der2+Der/Dimin+N:uhá»tji%>         DAGI_PLURAL    ;

! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Attr:#»ahtes%> ATTR ; Only for odd-syllble stems
!                       +Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:#»ahtá%>          K              ;
!                       +Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:#»ahti%>          K              ;
!                  +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:#»ahtes%>         K              ;
!                  +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:#»ahttá%>         PxV            ; !
!                     +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Ess:#»ahttá%>n        K              ;
!          +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Der5+Der/vuota:#»ahtes           VUOHTA         ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
!                         +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%>         ILL-EVENCASE   ;
!                         +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%>         N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
!                         +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:#»ahttá%>         BU/MUS         ;

!!€gt-norm: sissŋeluhá # Even-syllable test
!!€ sissŋeluhá:                 sissŋeluhá+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ sissŋeluhájda:                 sissŋeluhá+N+Pl+Ill
