src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
allelahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:allel SIJDDALAHÁ ;
badjilahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:badjil SIJDDALAHÁ ;
gábbmelahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gábbmel SIJDDALAHÁ ;
gæjnnulahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gæjnnul SIJDDALAHÁ ;
lahkalahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:lahkal SIJDDALAHÁ ;
lullelahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:lullel SIJDDALAHÁ ;
nuorrenjammelahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:nuorre#njammel SIJDDALAHÁ ;
oarjjilahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:oarjjil SIJDDALAHÁ ;
rubmálahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Cat:rubmál SIJDDALAHÁ ;
sijddalahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sijddal SIJDDALAHÁ ;
sissŋeluhá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Body:sissŋel SISSNELUHÁ ;
sjattulahá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Cat:sjattul SIJDDALAHÁ ;
